Arkansas, session 2025, SB331.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 79, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:

Subchapter 29 — Genetic Testing Act

23-79-2901. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Genetic Testing
Act".

23-79-2902. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) "Clinical genetic testing for an inherited cancer mutation"
means germline testing for an inherited mutation associated with an increased
cancer risk according to evidence-based, clinical practice guidelines;
(2) "Cost-sharing requirements" means a deductible payment,
coinsurance amount, copayment, or any similar out-of-pocket expense;
*ANS185*
03-20-2025 15:42:50 ANS185

As Engrossed: S3/20/25 SB331
(3) "Enrollee" means an individual entitled to coverage of
healthcare services from a healthcare insurer;
(4) "Evidence-based cancer imaging" means an evidence-based
cancer imaging modalities according to the National Comprehensive Cancer
Network clinical practice guidelines;
(5)(A) "Health benefit plan" means any individual, blanket, or
group plan, policy, or contract for healthcare services issued or delivered
by a healthcare insurer in this state.
(B) "Health benefit plan" does not include:
(i) Accident-only plans;
(ii) Specified disease plans;
(iii) Disability income plans;
(iv) Plans that provide only for indemnity for
hospital confinement;
(v) Long-term-care-only plans that do not include
pharmacy benefits;
(vi) Other limited-benefit health insurance policies
or plans;
(vii) Health benefit plans provided under Arkansas
Constitution, Article 5, § 32, the Workers' Compensation Law, § 11-9-101 et
seq., or the Public Employee Workers' Compensation Act, § 21-5-601 et seq.;
(viii) The Arkansas Medicaid Program;
(ix) A program established by the Arkansas Health
and Opportunity for Me Act of 2021, § 23-61-1001 et seq.;
(x) Any state or local governmental employee plan;
or
(xi) A plan that provides only dental benefits or
eye and vision care benefits;
(6)(A) "Healthcare insurer" means a:
(i) Health insurance issuer that is subject to state
law regulating insurance;
(ii) Health maintenance organization;
(iii) Hospital and medical service corporation; or
(iv) An entity that provides plans as a nonprofit
agricultural membership organization as defined in § 23-60-104.
(B) "Healthcare insurer" does not include an entity that
03-20-2025 15:42:50 ANS185

As Engrossed: S3/20/25 SB331
provides only dental benefits or eye and vision care benefits; and
(7) "Healthcare professional" means a person who is licensed,
certified, or otherwise authorized by the laws of this state to administer
health care in the ordinary course of the practice of his or her profession.

23-79-2903. Coverage for genetic testing for inherited cancer
mutations.
(a) On and after January 1, 2026, a health benefit plan that is
offered, issued, or renewed in this state shall provide coverage for:
(1) Clinical genetic testing for a clinical genetic testing for
an inherited cancer mutation for an enrollee with a personal or family
history of cancer if the clinical genetic testing for a clinical genetic
testing for an inherited cancer mutation is recommended by a healthcare
professional; and
(2) Evidenced-based cancer imaging for an enrollee with an
increased risk of cancer as recommended by National Comprehensive Cancer
Network clinical practice guidelines.
(b) The coverage under subsection (a) of this section is not subject
to any cost-sharing requirements under other applicable law.
(c)(1) If application of this section would result in health savings
account ineligibility under guidance issued by the United States Department
of the Treasury under 26 U.S.C. § 223, as in effect on January 1, 2025, then
this section shall apply only to health savings accounts with qualified high
deductible health plans with respect to the deductible of a health benefit
plan after the individual has satisfied the minimum deductible.
(2) This section does apply to items or services that are
considered to be preventive care under 26 U.S.C. § 223(c)(2)(C), as in effect
on January 1, 2025, whether or not the minimum deductible has been satisfied.

23-79-2904. Rules.
The Insurance Commissioner may develop and promulgate rules for the
implementation and administration of this subchapter.

/s/G. Leding


03-20-2025 15:42:50 ANS185